Wisconsin, session 2025, SB138.
do enact as follows:SB138,11Section 1. 20.437 (1) (hf) of the statutes is created to read:SB138,2,4220.437 (1) (hf) Sex-trafficking victim services. All moneys received from the 3prostitution crime surcharge as authorized under s. 944.35, for treatment and 4services for sex-trafficking victims under s. 48.48 (19).SB138,25Section 2. 20.455 (2) (hd) of the statutes is amended to read:SB138,2,12620.455 (2) (hd) Internet crimes against children. All moneys transferred 7under par. (Lp), 2017 Wisconsin Act 59, section 9228 (1p), and 2019 Wisconsin Act 89, section 9227 (1), shall be credited to this appropriation account and all moneys 9received from the prostitution crime surcharge as authorized under s. 944.35, for 10criminal investigative operations and law enforcement relating to Internet crimes 11against children, prosecution of Internet crimes against children, and activities of 12state and local Internet crimes against children task forces.SB138,313Section 3. 48.48 (19) of the statutes is amended to read:SB138,2,191448.48 (19) To purchase or provide treatment and services for children who are 15the victims of trafficking, as defined in s. 940.302 (1) (d), for purposes of a 16commercial sex act, as defined in s. 940.302 (1) (a). Within the availability of 17funding under s. 20.437 (1) (e) and (hf), the department shall ensure that that 18treatment and those services are available to children in all geographic areas of the 19state, including both urban and rural communities.SB138,420Section 4. 814.75 (28) of the statutes is created to read:SB138,2,2121814.75 (28) The prostitution crime surcharge under s. 944.35.SB138,522Section 5. 814.76 (21) of the statutes is created to read:SB138,3,11814.76 (21) The prostitution crime surcharge under s. 944.35.SB138,62Section 6. 944.35 of the statutes is created to read:SB138,3,63944.35 Prostitution crime surcharge. (1) If a court imposes a sentence or 4places a person on probation for a violation of s. 944.31, 944.32, 944.33, 944.34, 5948.08, or 948.081, the court shall impose under ch. 814 a prostitution crime 6surcharge of $5,000.SB138,3,137(2) The clerk of the circuit court shall collect and transmit to the county 8treasurer under s. 59.40 (2) (m) the amount of the surcharge. The county treasurer 9shall then pay the secretary of administration as provided in s. 59.25 (3) (f) 2. The 10secretary of administration shall deposit all amounts received under this 11subsection in the general fund, half of which is to be credited to the appropriation 12account under s. 20.437 (1) (hf) and half of which is to be credited to the 13appropriation account under s. 20.455 (2) (hd).SB138,714Section 7. 973.05 (2m) (fr) of the statutes is created to read:SB138,3,1615973.05 (2m) (fr) To payment of the prostitution crime surcharge until paid in 16full.SB138,817Section 8. Initial applicability.SB138,3,1918(1) This act first applies to offenses committed on the effective date of this 19subsection.SB138,3,2020